Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-333
Official Nebraska location fabric broadband access map; Nebraska Broadband Office; powers and duties; recipient of support or grant; provide information.

(1) The Nebraska Broadband Office may create and maintain an official Nebraska location fabric broadband access map showing broadband availability and quality of service for all serviceable locations in Nebraska utilizing any federal funding that is made available for such purpose. For purposes of this section, serviceable location means any residence, dwelling, business, or building where an entity provides or may provide broadband services.

(2) The Nebraska Broadband Office may contract with private parties to create, improve, and maintain the map. When contracting with private parties, the office shall give preference to contractors providing mapping services to the Federal Communications Commission. The office may collect from providers of broadband services any information necessary to establish and update the map. Any information provided to the office by a provider of broadband services pursuant to this section that is confidential, proprietary, or a trade secret as defined in section 87-502 shall be treated as such by the office.

(3) Any recipient of support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund shall comply with the provisions of this section. Any grant recipient under the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act, including any entity that operates as an eligible telecommunications carrier in Nebraska as defined in section 86-1302 that wishes to participate in the Broadband Bridge Program created under section 86-1303, either directly or as a challenging party under section 86-1307, shall comply with the provisions of this section. Any grant recipient of federal broadband funding administered by the Nebraska Broadband Office shall comply with the provisions of this section.

(4) After the Federal Communications Commission completes the national Broadband Serviceable Location Fabric and accompanying National Broadband Availability Map, the Nebraska Broadband Office shall annually evaluate whether the continued maintenance of any annually updated Nebraska location fabric broadband access map created and maintained in accordance with this section is necessary. The office shall report its annual findings pursuant to this subsection to the Transportation and Telecommunications Committee of the Legislature.

(5) The Nebraska Broadband Office shall utilize funding provided by the federal Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program authorized under the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58, to carry out this section.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 23.

Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act, see section 86-1301.